Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-184
Credential; disciplinary actions; time when taken.

If an applicant for a credential or a credential holder is convicted of an offense for which the credential may be denied or refused renewal or have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance with section 38-196, such denial, refusal of renewal, or disciplinary measures may be taken when the time for appeal of the conviction has elapsed or the conviction has been affirmed on appeal or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition or the execution of sentence, irrespective of any subsequent order under any statute allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or non vult contendere and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or the conviction, or releasing the person from probation, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 84.